Utah statutes.
17-22-23.   Crier of court.

The sheriff in attendance upon court shall, if required by the court, act as crier for the court, call the parties and witnesses and other persons bound to appear at the court, and make proclamation of the opening and adjournment of court and of any other matter under its direction.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

